Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 2, chapter 445, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) Section  1 [ of this 2015 Act ], chapter 445, Oregon Laws 2015, is repealed [ January
2, 2026] on the date on which the  Klamath County Circuit Court issues a water rights decree
affirming or  modifying the Findings of Fact and Order of Determination for the Klamath
River Basin Adjudication (Case No. WA1300001).
(2) Not more than 30 days  after the court issues the water rights decree described in
subsection (1) of this section, the Water Resources Director shall notify the committees  or
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources  and the Legis-
lative Counsel of the date on which the court issued the water rights decree.
[(2)] (3) Notwithstanding the repeal  of section 1 [ of this 2015 Act ], chapter 445, Oregon Laws
2015, by subsection (1) of this section, subject to modification or revocation under section  1 [ of this
2015 Act ], chapter 445, Oregon Laws 2015 , a lease  or temporary transfer of a determined claim
under section 1 [ of this 2015 Act ], chapter 445, Oregon Laws 2015,  for a  term beginning prior to
[January 2, 2026 ] the repeal of section 1, chapter 445, Oregon Laws  2015, by subsection (1) of
this section , may continue in effect for the term of the lease or temporary transfer. If a court
judgment results in a modification of the determined claim, the parties may continue the lease  or
temporary transfer of all or part of the water  right as modified for all or part of the original term
of the lease or temporary transfer.
Enrolled House Bill 2801 (HB 2801-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2801 (HB 2801-INTRO) Page 2